Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-3407
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Sector Partnership Program Act.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 12.
April 14, 2016